DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-35

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6X7-01

DTC | coz27s/ 11,co279/ 12 | ABS Solenoid Relay Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This relay supplies power to each ABS solenoid. After the ignition switch is turned ON, if the initial check is
OK, the relay goes on.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Conditions 1.and 2. continue for 0.2 sec. or more:
1.ECUterminalIG 1 voltageis9.5Vto 17.0Vandthe
solenoid relay is ON, however, the contact point of the
co0278/ 11 solenoidrelayis OFF.
2. With solenoidrelay ON, ECU terminal IG 1 voltage be-
comes 9.5V orless andthe contact point of the sole-
noid relay does not become ON.

* ABS solenoid relay
* ABS solenoid relay circuit

Immediately after ECUterminalIG 1 becomesON, and
solenoid relay is OFF, however, when the condition that
the solenoid relay due to the contact point is ON continues
for 0.2 sec. or more.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the ABS solenoid relay circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and

prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.

C0279/ 12

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM73  1E)



DI-36

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-37
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1 incaseofusingthehand -heldtesterand startfromstep2incase of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Check ABS solenoid relay operation.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe operation sound ofthe ABS solenoid relay when operating it with the hand -heldtester.
OK:

The operation sound of the ABS solenoid relay should be heard.

0K> Go to step 6.
NG \

2Checkvoltage betweenterminals 1 and2ofengineroom J/B (for ABS solenoid

relay).
Engine Room J/B: PREPARATION:
1—| Remove ABS solenoid relay from engine room J/B.
& CHECK:
5 Measure the voltage betweenterminals 1 and2ofengineroom
) J/B (for ABS solenoid relay).
) U OK:
oL © Voltage: 10 - 14 V
L /) )
2 F04447
NG Check and repair harness or connector.
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DI-38 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

3 | Check ABS solenoid relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from engine room J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid relay.
OK:
Terminals 4 and 6 Continuity
(Referencevalue80 Q)
Terminals 2 and 3 Continuity
Terminals 1 and3 Open

CHECK:
(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 4 and 6.
(b)  Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid

relay.
OK:
BR5403
R15254 Terminals 2 and 3 Open
R15255
Fo0o42 Terminals 1 and3 Continuity

NG> Replace ABS solenoid relay.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-39
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

4 | Check continuity between terminals 3 of ABS solenoid relay and terminal AST of
ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

CHECK:
ABS Solenoid Chec_:k continuity between terminal 3 of ABS solenoid relay and
terminal AST of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
OK:
Continuity
HINT:
There is a resistance of 33 = 3 Q between terminals 4 of con-
nector A48 and terminal 1 of connector A49.

[é Brake
Booster|

F02839 NG Repair or replace harness, connector or hy-
draulic brake booster.

3

5 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS sole-
noid relay and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

3

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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DI-40 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

6 [ Check for open circuit in harness and connector between AST of hydraulic brake
booster and AST of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Replace hydraulic brake booster or ABS &
BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
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